en: Acid, Acidifier, Acidulant, tartness, provides tartness, Food acid
ar: محمضات
bg: Киселина
ca: Àcid, Acidulant
cs: Kyselina, kyseliny
de: Säuerungsmittel, Sauerungsmittel, Säure, säurungsmittel
el: Μέσο οξίνισης
es: Acidulante, acidulantes, acidificante, acido
et: Hape
fi: Happo, Happoa, Hapot, Happoja
fr: Acidifiant, acide alimentaire, acide, acidulants, acide alimentaire
ga: Aigéad
he: חומצה
hr: kiselina, kiseline, sredstva kiselosti, kiseli
hu: Étkezési sav, etkezesi sav
it: Acidificante, acidificanti
ja: 酸味料
lt: Rūgštis
lv: Skābe
mk: киселина
mt: Aċidu
nb: Syre, Syrer
nl: Voedingszuur, voedingszuren
pl: Kwas, Kwasy, substancja zakwaszająca, substancje zakwaszające
pt: Acidificante
ro: Acidifiant, Agent acidifiant
ru: Кислота
sk: Kyselina
sl: Kislina
sv: Syra, Syror, Surgörare

en: Acidity regulator, alkali, base, buffer, buffering agent, pH adjusting agent, corrector of acidity, acid regulator, controls acidity
bg: Регулатор на киселинност, регулатор на киселинността, регулатори на киселинността, киселинни регулатори, коректор на киселинност
ca: Corrector de l'acidesa, correctors de l'acidesa, correctiu de l'acidesa, correctiu d'acidesa
cs: Regulátor kyselosti, regulátory kyselosti
da: Surhedsregulerende middel, Surhedsregulerende midler
de: Säureregulator, Säureregulatoren
el: Ρυθμιστής οξύτητας
es: Corrector de acidez, correctores de acidez, regulador de la acidez, agente de regulación del pH, agente regulador, reguladores de acidez, soluciones reguladoras, álcali, base, regulador de acidez
et: Happesuse regulaator, happesuse regulaatorid
fi: Happamuudensäätöaine, Happamuudensäätöaineet, Happamuudensäätöainetta, Happamuudensäätöaineita
fr: Correcteur d’acidité, régulateur de l'acidité, régulateur d'acidité, agent tampon, ajusteur du pH, alcali, base, tampon
ga: Rialtán aigéadachta
he: מווסת חומציות
hr: regulator kiselost, regulator kiselosti, regulatore kiselosti, regulatori kiselosti, tvar za regulaciju, tvar za regulaciju kiselost, tvar za regulaciju kiselosti
hu: Savanyúságot szabályozó anyag, Savanyúságot szabályozó anyagok, Savanyúságot szabályzó anyag, Savanyúságot szabályzó anyagok
id: pengatur keasaman
is: Sýrustillir, Sýrustillar
it: correttore di acidità, correttori di acidità, regolatore di acidità, regolatori di acidità, correttore d'acidità
ja: pH調整剤, ｐＨ調整剤, pH調整劑
lt: Rūgštingumą reguliuojanti medžiaga
lv: Skābuma regulētājs, Skābuma regulētāji
mt: Regolatur tal-Aċidità
nb: Surhetsregulerende middel, Surhetsregulerende midler
nl: Zuurteregelaar, Zuurteregelaars, Zuurtegraadregelaar
no: surhetsregulerende middel
pl: Regulator kwasowości, Regulatory kwasowości
pt: Regulador de acidez, regulador de ácidez, reguladores de acidez
ro: Corector de aciditate, Regulator de aciditate, regulatori de aciditate
ru: Регулятор кислотности, регуляторы кислотности
sk: Regulátor kyslosti
sl: Sredstvo za uravnavanje kislosti, sredstva za uravnavanje kislosti
sr: regulator kiselosti
sv: Surhetsreglerande medel, Surhetsreglerandemedel, Surhetsregulator
uk: регулятор кислотності

en: Anti-caking agent, anticaking agent, anti-stick agent, anti-sticking, drying agent, dusting agent, prevent caking, prevents caking, anti-clumping, anticaking blend, anticake
bg: Антислепващ агент
ca: Antiaglomerant
cs: Protispékavá látka, protispékavé látky
da: Antiklumpningsmiddel
de: Rieselhilfe, Antiagglomerationsmittel, Rieselhilfen, Trennmittel, Antiklumpmittel
el: Αντισυσσωματωτικό
es: Antiaglomerante, antiaglutinante, agente antiadherente, agente antiaglutinante, angente de empolvo, agente de sacado
et: Paakumisvastane aine
fi: Paakkuuntumisenestoaine, Paakkuuntumisenestoainetta, Paakkuuntumisenestoaineet, Paakkuuntumisenestoaineita
fr: Antiagglomérant, agent antiadhésif, agent de pulvérisation sèche, agent dessicateur, anti-agglomérant, poudre de fleurage, antimottant
ga: Oibreán frithstolptha
hr: sredstvo protiv zgrudnjavanja, sredstvo protiv zgrušavanja, sredstvo protiv zgrudvavanja, tvar protiv zgrudnjavanja, tvar protiv zgrušavanja, tvar za sprečavanje zgrudnjava, tvar za sprečavanje zgrudnjavanja, tvar za sprječavanje zgrudnjavanja, suha tvar, tvar za sprečavanju zgrudnjavanja
hu: Csomósodást és lesülést gátló anyag, Csomósodást gátló anyag
it: Agente antiagglomerante, agenti antiagglomeranti, antiagglomerante, antiagglomeranti
ja: 固結防止剤, ケーキング防止剤
lt: Lipnumą reguliuojanti medžiaga
lv: Pretsalipes viela
mt: Aġent kontra t-tagħqid
nb: Antiklumpemiddel, Antiklumpningsmidler
nl: Antiklontermiddel
pl: Substancja przeciwzbrylająca, Substancje przeciwzbrylające, Substancja przeciwzbrylajaca
pt: Antiaglomerante
ro: Agent antiaglomerant, antiaglomerant
sk: Protihrudkovacia látka
sl: Sredstvo proti sprijemanju
sv: Klumpförebyggande medel, Klumpförebyggandemedel
th: สารป้องกันการจับเป็นก้อน

en: Anti-foaming agent, de-foaming agent, antifoaming agent, defoaming agent, anti-foaming
bg: Антипенител
ca: Antiespumant
cs: Odpěňovač, odpěňovače
da: Skumdæmpningsmiddel
de: Schaumverhüter
el: Αντιαφριστικό
es: Antiespumante, reductor de espuma, reductores de espuma
et: Vahutamisvastane aine
fi: Vaahdonestoaine, Vaahdonestoainetta, Vaahdonestoaineet, Vaahdonestoaineita
fr: Antimoussant
ga: Oibreán frithchúrtha
hr: tvar protiv pjenjenja
hu: Habzásgátló
it: Agente antischiumogeno, agenti antischiumogeni, antischiumogeno, antischiumogeni
ja: 消泡剤
lt: Medžiaga nuo putojimo
lv: Putu dzēsējs
mt: Aġent kontra r-ragħwa
nl: Antischuimmiddel
pl: Substancja przeciwpieniąca, Substancje przeciwpieniące
pt: Antiespuma
ro: Antispumant
sk: Odpeňovacie činidlo
sl: Sredstvo proti penjenju
sv: Skumdämpningsmedel

en: Antioxidant, antibrowning agent, antioxidant synergist
bg: Антиоксидант, антиоксиданти
ca: Antioxidant, antioxidants, agent antienfosquiment
cs: Antioxidant, antioxidanty
da: Antioxidant, Antioxidanter
de: Antioxidant, Antioxidations-mittel, Antioxidationsmittel, Antioxidantsmittel, Antioxidantien, Antioxidanzien
el: Αντιοξειδωτικό
es: Antioxidante, antipardeamiento, sinérgicos de antioxidantes, antioxidantes
et: Antioksüdant
fi: Hapettumisenestoaine, Hapettumisenestoainetta, Hapettumisenestoaineet, Hapettumisenestoaineita, Antioksidantti
fr: Antioxydant, antioxygène, antibrunissant, antioxydant synergique, anti-oxydant
ga: Frithocsaídeoir
hr: antioksidans, antioksidansi, antioksidant, antioksidat, antioksindans
hu: Antioxidáns, antioxidánsok
it: Antiossidante, antiossidanti, agente antiossidante, agenti antiossidanti
ja: 酸化防止剤, 酸化防止劑
lt: Antioksidantas
lv: Antioksidants
mk: антиоксиданс
mt: Antiossidant
nb: Antioxidant, Antioksidant
nl: antioxidant, antioxidanten
nn: antioksidant
no: antioksidant
pl: Przeciwutleniacz, przeciwutleniacze, antyoksydant, antyoksydanty
pt: Antioxidante, antioxidantes
ro: antioxidant
ru: Антиоксидант, антиокислитель, антиокислители
sl: Antioksidant
sv: Antioxidationsmedel, Antioxidantmedel, Antioxidant
th: สารป้องกันการเกิดออกซิเดชัน

en: natural antioxidant
bg: естествен антиоксидант
ca: antioxidant natural
cs: přírodní antioxidant, přírodní antioxidanty
da: naturlig antioxidant
de: natürlicher Antioxidant
el: φυσικό αντιοξειδωτικό
es: antioxidante natural
et: looduslik antioksüdant
fi: luonnollinen antioksidantti
fr: antioxydant naturel
ga: frithocsaídeoir nádúrtha
hr: prirodni antioksidans
hu: természetes antioxidáns
it: antiossidanti naturali, antiossidante naturale
lt: natūralus antioksidantas
lv: dabīgs antioksidants
mt: antiossidant naturali
nl: natuurlijke antioxidant
pl: naturalny przeciwutleniacz
pt: antioxidante natural
ro: antioxidant natural
ru: натуральный антиоксидант
sk: prírodný antioxidant
sl: naravni antioksidant
sv: naturlig antioxidant

en: release agent
fr: agent de démoulage

en: Bleaching agent
ar: عامل تبييض
bg: избелващ агент
ca: agent de blanqueig
cs: bělicí činidlo, bělicí činidla
da: blegemiddel
de: Bleichmittel
el: λευκαντικός παράγοντας
eo: blankiga agento
es: Decolorante, blanqueador, blanqueadores
et: pleegitusaine
fa: سفید کننده
fi: Valkaisuaine, Valkaisuainetta, Valkaisuaineet, Valkaisuaineita
fr: Agent de blanchiment
ga: Gníomhaire tuaradh
he: חומר הלבנה
hr: sredstvo za izbjeljivanje
hu: Fehérítőszer
id: bahan pemutih
is: bleikiefni
it: Sbiancante, decolorante, agente di sbiancamento
ja: 漂白剤
ko: 표백제
lt: balinimo priemonė
lv: balinātājs
mk: средство за белење
mt: aġent tal-ibbliċjar
nl: bleekmiddel
no: blekemiddel
pl: wybielacz
pt: Agente de branqueamento
ro: agent de albire
ru: отбеливатель
sk: bieliace činidlo
sl: belilo
sq: agjent zbardhues
sv: blekmedel
th: สารฟอกขาว
tr: ağartma maddesi
uk: відбілювач
vi: chất tẩy trắng
zh: 漂白剂

en: Bulking agent, filler
bg: Пълнител
ca: Incrementador de volum
cs: Plnidlo, plnidla
da: fyldemiddel, fyldemidler, fyldstof, fyldstoffer
de: Füllstoff, Füllstoffe
el: Διογκωτικό
es: Agente de carga, Incrementador de volumen, agente de relleno, incrementadores del volumen
et: Mahuaine
fi: Täyteaine, Täyteainetta, Täyteaineet, Täyteaineita
fr: Agent de charge
ga: Toirteoir
hr: sredstva za povećanje zapremine, tvar za povećanje volumena
hu: Tömegnövelő szer, térfogatnövelőszer, térfogatnövelőszerek
it: Agente di carica, agenti di carica
lt: Užpildas
lv: Apjoma palielinātājs
mt: Aġent li jżid il-volum
nb: Fyllstoff
nl: Vulstof, Vulstoffen
pl: Substancja wypełniająca, Substancje wypełniające
pt: Agente de volume
ro: Agent de încărcare
ru: Наполнитель, фруктово-ягодный наполнитель
sk: Objemové činidlo
sl: Sredstvo za povečanje prostornine
sv: Fyllnadsmedel

en: Carbonating agent, carbonation
ar: عامل كربوني
bg: Карбонизиращ агент
ca: Agent de carbonatació
cs: Karbonatační činidlo, karbonatační činidla
da: Carboneringsmiddel
de: Karbonisierungsmittel, Karbonisiermittel
el: Ανθρακικό μέσο
es: agente de carbonatación
et: Karboniseeriv aine
fi: Karbonointiaine, Karbonointiainetta, Karbonointiaineet, Karbonointiaineita
fr: Agent de carbonation
ga: Gníomhaire carbónáitithe
he: חומר קרבונציה
hr: Sredstvo za karbonizaciju
hu: Szénsavasító anyag
id: Agen karbonasi
is: Kolsýruefni
it: Agente di carbonatazione
ja: 炭酸化剤
ko: 탄산 화제
lt: Karbonizuojantis agentas
lv: Karbonizācijas aģents
mk: Агенс за карбонизација
mt: Aġent tal-karbonizzazzjoni
nl: Carbonatatiemiddel
no: Karboneringsmiddel
pl: Środek karbonujący
pt: Agente de carbonatação
ro: Agent de carbonare
ru: Карбонизирующий агент
sk: Karbonizačné činidlo
sl: Sredstvo za karbonizacijo
sq: Agjent karbonizues
sv: Kolsyremedel
th: สารคาร์บอเนต
tr: Karbonatlaşma ajanı
uk: Карбонізуючий агент
zh: 碳酸化剂

en: Carrier, carrier solvant, diluent for other food additives, encapsulating agent, nutrient carrier
es: Agente encapsulador, diluyente de otros aditivos alimentarios, disolvente inerte, sustancia inerte, sustancia inerte portadora de nutriente
fr: Support, agent d'encapsulation, diluant d'autres additifs alimentaires, solvant de support, support de nutriment

en: Colour, color, colouring, coloring, decorative pigment, surface colorant, for color, artificial color, artificial colour, color added, colors added, artificial color added, colorant, colours, colors, coloring food, colouring food, synthetic colour, colouring agent, coloring agent, colored, coloured, colourant, colourants
bg: Оцветител, оцветители
ca: Color, colors, colorant, colorants, pigment decoratiu
cs: Barvivo, barviva
da: Farvestof, Farvestoffer, Farve, farver
de: Farbstoff, Farbstoffe
el: χρωστική, χρωστικές, Χρωστική ουσία, χρωστικές ουσίες
es: Colorante, colorantes, color, colorante de superficie, pigmentos de coloración y decoración, pigmentos de coloración, pigmentos de decoración, colorantes alimentarios, colorante alimentario
et: Toiduvärv
fi: Väri, Väriä, Värit, Värejä, Väriaine, Väriainetta, Väriaineet, Väriaineita, Elintarvikeväri, värjäävät elintarvikkeet
fr: Colorant, colorant de surface, pigment décoratif, pigment colorant, colorants, colorant alimentaire, colorants alimentaires, aliments colorants
ga: Dath
he: צבע
hr: boja, boje, bojila, bojilo, bojenje, namirnice za bojanje, hrana za bojenje, hrana za bojanje
hu: Színezék, mesterséges színezék, színezőanyag, színezékek, színezőanyagok, színező anyag
is: Litarefni
it: Colorante, coloranti, alimento colorante
ja: 着色料
lt: Dažiklis
lv: Krāsa, Krāsviela
mk: боја
mt: Kulur
nb: Farge, Farve, Fargestoff, Fargestoffer, fødevarer der farver
nl: Kleuren, Kleurstof, kleurstoffen, kleurend levensmiddel
pl: Barwnik, Barwniki
pt: Corante, corantes
ro: Colorant, coloranți
ru: Краситель, красители, краситель пищевой, пищевые красители, пищевой краситель
sk: Farbivo
sl: Barvilo
sr: boja
sv: Färg, Färgämne, Färgämnen, färgande livsmedel
uk: барвник
zh: 色素

en: concentrated plant colour
ar: لون نباتي مركز
bg: концентриран растителен цвят
ca: colorant vegetal concentrat
cs: koncentrované rostlinné barvivo
da: koncentreret plantefarve
de: färbendes Pflanzenkonzentrat, färbende Pflanzenkonzentrate
el: συμπυκνωμένο φυτικό χρώμα
es: colorante vegetal concentrado
et: kontsentreeritud taimne värv
fi: tiivistetty kasviväri
fr: colorant végétal concentré
ga: dath plandaí comhchruinnithe
he: צבע צמחי מרוכז
hr: koncentrirana biljna boja
hu: koncentrált növényi színezék
it: colorante vegetale concentrato
ja: 濃縮植物色素
ko: 농축 식물성 색소
lt: koncentruotas augalinis dažiklis
lv: koncentrēta augu krāsa
mk: концентрирана растителна боја
mt: kulur tal-pjanti kkonċentrat
nl: geconcentreerde plantaardige kleurstof
pl: koncentraty barwiące, koncentrat barwiący, wyciągi barwiące, barwiące koncentraty
pt: corante vegetal concentrado
ro: colorant vegetal concentrat
ru: концентрированный растительный краситель
sk: koncentrované rastlinné farbivo
sl: koncentrirano rastlinsko barvilo
sv: koncentrerad växtfärg
th: สีจากพืชเข้มข้น
tr: konsantre bitki rengi
uk: концентрований рослинний колір
zh: 浓缩植物色素

en: natural colours
bg: оцветяващи плодови екстракти
ca: Color natural, colors naturals
da: naturlig farve
de: natürliche Farbstoffe
es: Color natural, colores naturales, colorante natural, colorantes naturales
fi: luontainen väriaine, luontainen väri, luontainen elintarvikeväri
fr: colorant naturel, colorants naturels
hr: prirodno bojilo
hu: természetes színezék, természetes színezékek, természetes színezőanyag, természetes színezőanyagok
it: coloranti naturali, colorante naturale
nl: Natuurlijke kleurstoffen, natuurlijk kleurstof
pl: barwnik naturalny, barwniki naturalne, naturalny barwnik, naturalne barwniki, naturalny preparat barwiący
ru: краситель натуральный, натуральный краситель, натуральные красители
uk: натуральний барвник

fr: denrée alimentaire colorante, denrées alimentaires colorantes
ca: colorant alimentari, colorants alimentaris
de: färbendes Lebensmittel, färbende Lebensmittel
es: colorante alimenticio, colorantes alimenticios
hu: élelmiszer színezék
it: sostanze alimentari coloranti
pl: żywność barwiąca, środek spożywczy o właściwościach barwiących, środek spożywczy barwiący, środki spożywcze barwiące

fr: colorant de la croûte, colorants de croûte, colorants de la croûte
en: crust colorant, crust colorants
ar: تلوين القشرة
bg: оцветител за коричка
ca: colorant de l'escorça
cs: barvivo kůrky
da: skorpefarve
de: Krustenfarbstoff, Krustenfarbstoffe
el: χρωστική ουσίας κρούστας
es: colorante de la corteza, colorantes de corteza
fi: kuoren väriaine
ga: dathú screamh
he: צבע קרום
hr: bojilo za koru
hu: kéregszínezék
it: colorante della crosta, coloranti della crosta
ja: クラスト着色料
ko: 껍질 착색제
lt: plutos dažiklis
lv: garozas krāsviela
mk: боја за кора
mt: kulur tal-qoxra
nl: korstkleurstof, korstkleurstoffen
pl: barwnik do skórki
pt: corante de crosta, corantes de crosta
ro: colorant de crustă
ru: краситель для корочки
sk: farbivo kôrky
sl: barvilo za skorjo
sq: ngjyrues i kore
sv: skorpfärg
th: สารให้สีเปลือก
tr: kabuk renklendirici
uk: барвник для скоринки
zh: 外壳着色剂

en: colour retention agent, colour adjunct, colour fixative, colour stabilizer, maintain color, color retention
de: Farbstabilisator
es: Agente de retención de color, complementos del color, estabilizador del color, estabilizadores del color, fijadores del color, fijador del color
fr: agent de rétention de la couleur, fixateur de la couleur, fixateur de couleur, adjuvant de la couleur, stabilisant de la couleur, agent de rétention de couleur, fixateur de couleur, adjuvant de couleur, stabilisant de couleur
ja: 発色剤
pl: do korekcji barwy, substancja wzmacniająca kolor
pt: estabilizador de cor

en: Emulsifier, clouding agent, crystallization inhibitor, density adjustment agent, dispersing agent, emulsifier blend, emulsifying agent, emulsifying, plasticizer, surface active agent, suspension agent
bg: Емулгатор, емулгатори
ca: Emulsionant, emulgent, emulgents, emulsiu, agent dispersant, agents dispersants
cs: Emulgátor, emulgátory
da: Emulgator, Emulgatorer, Emulgeringsmiddel
de: Emulgator, Emulgatoren
el: Γαλακτωματοποιητής
es: Emulgente, Emulsificante, emulsionante, agente dispersante, agente enturbiador, agentes enturbiadores, agente tensoactivo, corrector de la densidad, estabilizadores de una suspensión, estabilizador de una suspensión, inhibidor de la cristalización, plastificante
et: Emulgaator
fi: Emulgointiaine, Emulgointiainetta, Emulgointiaineet, Emulgointiaineita
fr: Émulsifiant, agent de dispersion, agent de surface, agent de suspension, agent d'ajustement de la densité, inhibiteur de cristallisation, nébulisant, plastifiant
ga: Eiblitheoir
hr: emulgator, emulgatori, emlgatori, emuglator, smjesa emulgatora, smjesa za emulgiranje
hu: Emulgeálószer, emulgeálószerek, kristályosodásgátló, sűrűségszabályozó szer, diszpergálószer, lágyító, felületaktív anyag, szuszpenziós szer
is: Yruefni
it: Emulsionante, emulsionanti, agente emulsionante, agenti emulsionanti
ja: 乳化剤
lt: Emulsiklis, emulsikliai
lv: Emulgators
mk: емулгатор
mt: Emulsifikant
nb: Emulgeringsmiddel, Emulgator, Emulgatorer
nl: Emulgator, Emulgatoren
pl: Emulgator, Emulgatory
pt: Emulsionante, emulsionantes, emulsificante
ro: Emulsifiant, Emulgator, emulsifianți
ru: Эмульгатор, эмульгаторы
sk: Emulgátor
sl: Emulgator
sv: emulgeringsmedel, emulgering, emulgator
th: อิมัลซิไฟเออร์
uk: емульгатор, емульгатори

en: natural emulsifier
ar: مستحلب طبيعي
bg: естествен емулгатор
ca: emulsionant natural
cs: přírodní emulgátor, přírodní emulgátory
da: naturlig emulgator
de: natürlicher Emulgator
el: φυσικός γαλακτωματοποιητής
eo: natura emulsiigilo
es: emulsionante natural
et: looduslik emulgaator
fi: luonnollinen emulgointiaine
fr: émulsifiant naturel
ga: eiblitheoir nádúrtha
he: מתחלב טבעי
hr: prirodni emulgator
hu: természetes emulgeálószer
id: emulsifier alami
is: náttúrulegur ýruefni
it: emulsionanti naturali, emulsionante naturale
ja: 天然乳化剤
ko: 천연 유화제
lt: natūralus emulsiklis
lv: dabīgs emulgators
mk: природен емулгатор
ms: pengemulsi semulajadi
mt: emulsifikant naturali
nb: naturlig emulgator
nl: natuurlijke emulgator
pl: naturalny emulgator
pt: emulsionante natural
ro: emulgator natural
ru: натуральный эмульгатор
sk: prírodný emulgátor
sl: naravni emulgator
sq: emulsifikator natyral
sv: naturlig emulgeringsmedel
th: อิมัลซิไฟเออร์ธรรมชาติ
tr: doğal emülgatör
uk: натуральний емульгатор
vi: chất nhũ hóa tự nhiên
zh: 天然乳化剂

en: Emulsifying salts, emulsifying salt synergist, melding salt, Emulsifying salt, melting salt
bg: Емулгаторни соли
ca: Surts de fos, sals de fondre, sal de fondre
cs: Tavicí soli
da: Smeltesalt
de: Schmelzsalze, Schmelzsalz
el: Γαλακτωματοποιητικά άλατα
es: Sales fundentes, Sales emulsionantes, sales de mezcla, sinergista de sal emulsionante, sales de fundido, sal fundente, sal emulsionante
et: Emulgeeriv sool
fi: Sulatesuola, Sulatesuolaa, Sulatesuolat, Sulatesuoloja
fr: Sels émulsifiants, sel émulsifiant, sels de fonte, sel de fonte, synergiste de sel émulsifiant
ga: Salainn eiblithe
hr: emulgatorske soli, emulgatorska sol
hu: Emulgeálósók
is: Bræðslusölt
it: Sale di fusione, sali di fusione
lt: Emulsinimo druskos
lv: Emulģējošie sāļi
mt: Melħ emulsifikat
nl: Smeltzout, Smeltzouten
pl: Sole emulgujące
pt: Sais de fusão
ro: Săruri de topire
ru: эмульгирующая соль
sk: Emulgujúce soli
sl: Emulgirne soli
sv: Smältsalt, Smältsalter